Hawaii statutes.
§652-15 Law applicable to all courts.
This chapter and the powers conferred therein shall extend to all the
common-law courts of the State, according to their jurisdiction. [L 1876, c 35,
§13; RL 1925, §2844; RL 1935, §4283; RL 1945, §10315; RL 1955, §237-15; HRS
§652-15]

Case Notes

"Common law courts" are those in contradistinction
to courts of equity; district court has jurisdiction in proper cases. 19 H.
625 (1909). See also 22 H. 229 (1914).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next